Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 114D.30, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Reports to legislature. By January 15 each odd-numbered year, the council must submit a report to the legislature that includes: (1) a summary of the activities for which money has been or will be spent in the current biennium; (2) the recommendations required under subdivision 6 for how money in the clean water fund should be spent in the next biennium, new text begin broken out by fiscal year and new text end including recommended legislative bill language; and (3) the impact on economic development of the implementation of efforts to protect and restore groundwater and the impaired waters program.